District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.55

Certificate filed by nonresident as proof of financial responsibility.

A nonresident may give proof of financial responsibility by filing with the Mayor a written certificate or certificates of an insurance carrier authorized to transact business in the state in which the vehicle, or vehicles, owned by such nonresident is registered, or in the state in which such nonresident resides, if he does not own a vehicle, provided such certificate otherwise conforms with the provisions of this chapter, and the Mayor shall accept the same upon condition that said insurance carrier complies with the following provisions with respect to the policies so certified:

(1)

Said insurance carrier shall execute a power of attorney authorizing the Mayor to accept service on its behalf of notice or process in any action arising out of a motor vehicle accident in the District of Columbia;

(2)

Said insurance carrier shall agree in writing that such policies shall be deemed to conform with the laws of the District of Columbia relating to the terms of motor vehicle liability policies issued therein.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 133, ch. 222, § 55

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1301.53.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-455.
1973 Ed., § 40-471.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.